Massachusetts, session 194th, S1779.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 131M of Chapter 140 of the Massachusetts General laws as amended by Chapter
135, Section 71 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby amended by inserting after the words "as
amended" in subsection (e)(i) the following:-- ", or a law enforcement officer as defined in
section 1 of Chapter 6E"
of 1